Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-1,136
Registered dairy heifer development facility; rescind registration; grounds.

The brand committee may rescind the registration of any registered dairy heifer development facility operator who (1) violates sections 54-1,132 to 54-1,137, (2) fails to cooperate with the brand committee or any employee of the brand committee who is acting in the capacity of the brand committee, or (3) violates the rules and regulations of the brand committee covering registered dairy heifer development facilities.

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 22.
July 18, 2026